Illinois, session 104th, HB1878.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Sections 5-1031 and 5-1031.1 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1031)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1031)7    Sec. 5-1031. County real estate transfer tax. 8    (a) The county board of a county may impose a tax upon the 9privilege of transferring title to real estate, as represented 10by the deed that is filed for recordation, and upon the 11privilege of transferring a beneficial interest in a land 12trust holding legal title to real estate located in such 13county as represented by the trust document that is filed for 14recordation, at the rate of 25 cents for each $500 of value or 15fraction thereof stated in the declaration required by Section 1631-25 of the Property Tax Code. If, however, the real estate is 17transferred subject to a mortgage, the amount of the mortgage 18remaining outstanding at the time of transfer shall not be 19included in the basis of computing the tax.20    A tax imposed pursuant to this Section shall be collected 21by the recorder or registrar of titles of the county prior to 22recording the deed or trust document or registering the title 23subject to the tax. All deeds or trust documents exempted in   HB1878- 2 -LRB104 09697 HLH 19763 b1Section 31-45 of the Property Tax Code shall also be exempt 2from any tax imposed pursuant to this Section. A tax imposed 3pursuant to this Section shall be in addition to all other 4occupation and privilege taxes imposed by the State of 5Illinois or any municipal corporation or political subdivision 6thereof.7    (b) The county board may impose a tax at the same rate on 8the transfer of a beneficial interest, as defined in Section 931-5 of the Property Tax Code. If, however, the transferring 10document states that the real estate or beneficial interest is 11transferred subject to a mortgage, then the amount of the 12mortgage remaining outstanding at the time of transfer shall 13not be included in the basis of computing the tax.14    The tax must be paid at the time of recordation or, if a 15document is not recorded, at the time of presentation of the 16transfer declaration to the recorder, as provided in Section 1731-25 of the Property Tax Code. All deeds or documents 18relating to the transfer of a beneficial interest exempted in 19Sections 31-45 or 31-46 of the Property Tax Code are also 20exempt from any tax imposed under this Section. A tax imposed 21under this Section is in addition to all other occupation and 22privilege taxes imposed by the State of Illinois or any 23municipal corporation or political subdivision thereof.24    (c) Beginning June 1, 2005, a tax imposed under this 25Section is due if the transfer is made by one or more related 26transactions or involves one or more persons or entities,   HB1878- 3 -LRB104 09697 HLH 19763 b1regardless of whether a document is recorded.2    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 3county recorder or registrar of titles is required to accept 4payment of the tax imposed under this Section by credit card; 5however, all service charges or fees associated with the 6processing or accepting of such a credit card payment shall be 7paid by the taxpayer. 8(Source: P.A. 93-1099, eff. 6-1-05.) 9    (55 ILCS 5/5-1031.1)10    Sec. 5-1031.1. Home rule real estate transfer taxes. 11    (a) After the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 1293rd General Assembly and subject to this Section, a home rule 13county may impose or increase a tax or other fee on the 14privilege of transferring title to real estate, on the 15privilege of transferring a beneficial interest in real 16property, and on the privilege of transferring a controlling 17interest in a real estate entity, as the terms "beneficial 18interest", "controlling interest", and "real estate entity" 19are defined in Article 31 of the Property Tax Code. Such a tax 20or other fee shall hereafter be referred to as a real estate 21transfer tax. 22    (b) Before adopting a resolution to submit the question of 23imposing or increasing a real estate transfer tax to 24referendum, the corporate authorities shall give public notice 25of and hold a public hearing on the intent to submit the   HB1878- 4 -LRB104 09697 HLH 19763 b1question to referendum. This hearing may be part of a 2regularly scheduled meeting of the corporate authorities. The 3notice shall be published not more than 30 nor less than 10 4days prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general 5circulation within the county. The notice shall be published 6in the following form: 7        Notice of Proposed (Increased) Real Estate Transfer 8    Tax for (commonly known name of county). 9        A public hearing on a resolution to submit to 10    referendum the question of a proposed (increased) real 11    estate transfer tax for (legal name of the county) in an 12    amount of (rate) to be paid by the buyer (seller) of the 13    real estate transferred will be held on (date) at (time) 14    at (location). The current rate of real estate transfer 15    tax imposed by (name of county) is (rate). 16        Any person desiring to appear at the public hearing 17    and present testimony to the taxing district may do so. 18    (c) A notice that includes any information not specified 19and required by this Section is an invalid notice. All 20hearings shall be open to the public. At the public hearing, 21the corporate authorities of the county shall explain the 22reasons for the proposed or increased real estate transfer tax 23and shall permit persons desiring to be heard an opportunity 24to present testimony within reasonable time limits determined 25by the corporate authorities. A copy of the proposed ordinance 26shall be made available to the general public for inspection   HB1878- 5 -LRB104 09697 HLH 19763 b1before the public hearing. 2    (d) No home rule county shall impose a new real estate 3transfer tax after the effective date of this amendatory Act 4of 1996 without prior approval by referendum. No home rule 5county shall impose an increase of the rate of a current real 6estate transfer tax without prior approval by referendum. A 7home rule county may impose a new real estate transfer tax or 8may increase an existing real estate transfer tax with prior 9referendum approval. The referendum shall be conducted as 10provided in subsection (e). An existing ordinance or 11resolution imposing a real estate transfer tax may be amended 12without approval by referendum if the amendment does not 13increase the rate of the tax or add transactions on which the 14tax is imposed. 15    (e) The home rule county shall, by resolution, provide for 16submission of the proposition to the voters. The home rule 17county shall certify the resolution and the proposition to the 18proper election officials in accordance with the general 19election law. If the proposition is to impose a new real estate 20transfer tax, it shall be in substantially the following form: 21"Shall (name of county) impose a real estate transfer tax at a 22rate of (rate) to be paid by the buyer (seller) of the real 23estate transferred, with the revenue of the proposed transfer 24tax to be used for (purpose)?". If the proposition is to 25increase an existing real estate transfer tax, it shall be in 26the following form: "Shall (name of county) impose a real   HB1878- 6 -LRB104 09697 HLH 19763 b1estate transfer tax increase of (percent increase) to 2establish a new real estate transfer tax rate of (rate) to be 3paid by the buyer (seller) of the real estate transferred? The 4current rate of the real estate transfer tax is (rate), and the 5revenue is used for (purpose). The revenue from the increase 6is to be used for (purpose).". 7    If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition 8vote in favor of it, the county may impose or increase the real 9estate transfer tax. 10    (f) Nothing in this amendatory Act of 1996 shall limit the 11purposes for which real estate transfer tax revenues may be 12collected or expended. 13    (g) A home rule county may not impose real estate transfer 14taxes other than as authorized by this Section. This Section 15is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions 16under subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 17Illinois Constitution. 18    (h) Notwithstanding subsection (g) of this Section, any 19real estate transfer taxes adopted by a county at any time 20prior to January 17, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 2189-701) and any amendments to any existing real estate 22transfer tax ordinance adopted after that date, in accordance 23with the law in effect at the time of the adoption of the 24amendments, are not preempted by this amendatory Act of the 2593rd General Assembly. 26    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each   HB1878- 7 -LRB104 09697 HLH 19763 b1county recorder or registrar of titles is required to accept 2payment of the tax imposed under this Section by credit card; 3however, all service charges or fees associated with the 4processing or accepting of such a credit card payment shall be 5paid by the taxpayer. 6(Source: P.A. 93-657, eff. 6-1-04.)